Colorado, session 2026A, HB1415.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 24-31-120 as
follows:
24-31-120. Residential construction contractor certification
enterprise - fund - goals - certification program - gifts, grants, or
donations - legislative declaration - definitions - repeal.
(1) Legislative declaration. THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY HEREBY:
(a) FINDS AND DETERMINES THAT:
-2- HB26-1415

(I) BY PROVIDING THE BENEFITS AND SERVICES SPECIFIED IN
SUBSECTION (7) OF THIS SECTION, THE RESIDENTIAL CONSTRUCTION
CONTRACTOR CERTIFICATION ENTERPRISE ENGAGES IN AN ACTIVITY
CONDUCTED IN THE PURSUIT OF A BENEFIT, GAIN, OR LIVELIHOOD AND
THEREFORE OPERATES AS A BUSINESS;
(II) CONSISTENT WITH THE DETERMINATION OF THE COLORADO
SUPREME COURT IN NICHOLL V. E-470 PUBLIC HIGHWAY AUTHORITY, 896
P.2d 859 (COLO. 1995), THAT THE POWER TO IMPOSE TAXES IS
INCONSISTENT WITH ENTERPRISE STATUS UNDER SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE
X OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION, IT IS THE CONCLUSION OF THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY THAT THE FEE COLLECTED BY THE ENTERPRISE IS A FEE, NOT A
TAX, BECAUSE THE FEE IS IMPOSED FOR THE SPECIFIC PURPOSE OF
ALLOWING THE ENTERPRISE TO DEFRAY THE COSTS OF PROVIDING THE
BUSINESS SERVICES SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (1)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION TO
CUSTOMERS THAT PAY THE FEE AND THE FEE IS COLLECTED AT A RATE
THAT IS REASONABLY CALCULATED BASED ON THE BENEFITS RECEIVED BY
THOSE CUSTOMERS;
(III) SO LONG AS THE RESIDENTIAL CONSTRUCTION CONTRACTOR
CERTIFICATION ENTERPRISE QUALIFIES AS AN ENTERPRISE FOR PURPOSES
OF SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION, THE REVENUE
FROM THE FEE COLLECTED BY THE ENTERPRISE IS NOT STATE FISCAL YEAR
SPENDING, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 24-77-102 (17), OR STATE REVENUES,
AS DEFINED IN SECTION 24-77-103.6 (6)(c), AND DOES NOT COUNT
AGAINST EITHER THE STATE FISCAL YEAR SPENDING LIMIT IMPOSED BY
SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION OR THE EXCESS
STATE REVENUES CAP, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 24-77-103.6 (6)(b)(I)(B);
AND
-3- HB26-1415

(IV) NO OTHER ENTERPRISE CREATED SIMULTANEOUSLY OR
WITHIN THE PRECEDING FIVE YEARS SERVES PRIMARILY THE SAME PURPOSE
AS THE RESIDENTIAL CONSTRUCTION CONTRACTOR CERTIFICATION
ENTERPRISE AND THE ENTERPRISE WILL GENERATE REVENUE FROM FEES
AND SURCHARGES OF LESS THAN ONE HUNDRED MILLION DOLLARS TOTAL
IN ITS FIRST FIVE FISCAL YEARS. ACCORDINGLY, THE CREATION OF THE
RESIDENTIAL CONSTRUCTION CONTRACTOR CERTIFICATION ENTERPRISE
DOES NOT REQUIRE VOTER APPROVAL PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-77-108.
(2) Definitions. AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT
OTHERWISE REQUIRES:
(a) "BOARD" MEANS THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF THE
ENTERPRISE.
(b) "CERTIFICATION PROGRAM" MEANS THE RESIDENTIAL
CONSTRUCTION CONTRACTOR CERTIFICATION PROGRAM CREATED IN
SUBSECTION (7) OF THIS SECTION.
(c) "CONTRACTOR" MEANS A PERSON UNDERTAKING OR
PERFORMING RESIDENTIAL CONSTRUCTION.
(d) "DEPARTMENT" MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF LAW.
(e) "ENTERPRISE" MEANS THE RESIDENTIAL CONSTRUCTION
CONTRACTOR CERTIFICATION ENTERPRISE CREATED IN SUBSECTION (3) OF
THIS SECTION.
(f) "FEE" MEANS THE FEE DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS
SECTION.
(g) "FUND" MEANS THE CONTRACTOR CERTIFICATION CASH FUND
CREATED IN SUBSECTION (5) OF THIS SECTION.
(h) "RESIDENTIAL CONSTRUCTION" MEANS WORK ON RESIDENTIAL
STRUCTURES FOR REMUNERATION AND INCLUDES THE BUILDING,
-4- HB26-1415

ALTERATION, REPAIR, REMODELING, DEMOLITION, OR IMPROVEMENT OF
ANY RESIDENTIAL STRUCTURE, AND GENERAL CONTRACTING, CARPENTRY,
ELECTRICAL, PLUMBING, HVAC, MASONRY, CONCRETE WORK, ROOFING,
OR OTHER SPECIALIZED TRADES THAT BENEFIT A RESIDENTIAL STRUCTURE.
(3) Enterprise.
(a) THE RESIDENTIAL CONSTRUCTION CONTRACTOR CERTIFICATION
ENTERPRISE IS CREATED IN THE DEPARTMENT OF LAW . THE ENTERPRISE IS
AND OPERATES AS A GOVERNMENT-OWNED BUSINESS WITHIN THE
DEPARTMENT FOR THE BUSINESS PURPOSES OF USING FEE REVENUE TO
ADMINISTER THE CERTIFICATION PROGRAM, EVALUATE CONTRACTORS
THAT HAVE APPLIED FOR CERTIFICATION, AND ISSUE CERTIFICATES TO
CONTRACTORS APPROVED BY THE BOARD. THE ENTERPRISE IS A TYPE 2
ENTITY AS DEFINED IN SECTION 24-1-105, AND EXERCISES ITS POWERS AND
PERFORMS ITS DUTIES AND FUNCTIONS UNDER THE DEPARTMENT.
(b) THE ENTERPRISE CONSTITUTES AN ENTERPRISE FOR PURPOSES
OF SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION SO LONG AS IT
RETAINS THE AUTHORITY TO ISSUE REVENUE BONDS AND RECEIVES LESS
THAN TEN PERCENT OF ITS TOTAL REVENUES IN GRANTS FROM THE STATE
AND ALL LOCAL GOVERNMENTS COMBINED. SO LONG AS IT CONSTITUTES
AN ENTERPRISE PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (3)(b), THE ENTERPRISE IS
NOT SUBJECT TO SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION.
(c) THE ENTERPRISE'S PRIMARY POWERS AND DUTIES ARE TO:
(I) COLLECT THE FEE DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS
SECTION;
(II) EVALUATE CONTRACTORS WHO HAVE APPLIED FOR
CERTIFICATION AND DETERMINE WHETHER TO CERTIFY THE CONTRACTOR
IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (7) OF THIS SECTION;
-5- HB26-1415

(III) BY RESOLUTION, AUTHORIZE AND ISSUE REVENUE BONDS
THAT ARE PAYABLE ONLY FROM THE MONEY IN THE FUND, WHICH MAY BE
ISSUED TO FURTHER THE ENTERPRISE'S PURPOSES;
(IV) ADOPT, AMEND, OR REPEAL POLICIES FOR THE REGULATION
OF ITS AFFAIRS AND THE CONDUCT OF ITS BUSINESS CONSISTENT WITH THIS
SECTION, INCLUDING ESTABLISHING APPLICATION, REVIEW, APPROVAL,
REPORTING, AND OTHER REQUIREMENTS FOR CERTIFICATION; AND
(V) ENGAGE THE SERVICE OF CONSTRUCTION CONTRACTORS,
CONSULTANTS, AND LEGAL COUNSEL, INCLUDING THE DEPARTMENT, FOR
PROFESSIONAL AND TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE AND ADVICE AND TO SUPPLY
OTHER SERVICES RELATED TO THE CONDUCT OF THE AFFAIRS OF THE
ENTERPRISE, WITHOUT REGARD TO THE "PROCUREMENT CODE", ARTICLES
101 TO 112 OF THIS TITLE 24.
(d) THE ENTERPRISE IS GOVERNED BY A BOARD OF DIRECTORS. THE
BOARD CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING THIRTEEN MEMBERS APPOINTED BY
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL OR THEIR DESIGNEE:
(I) ONE MEMBER REPRESENTING THE DEPARTMENT OF LAW;
(II) ONE MEMBER REPRESENTING THE DIVISION OF HOUSING IN THE
DEPARTMENT OF LOCAL AFFAIRS;
(III) ONE MEMBER REPRESENTING THE DIVISION OF PROFESSIONS
AND OCCUPATIONS IN THE DEPARTMENT OF REGULATORY AGENCIES;
(IV) ONE MEMBER WHO HAS EXPERIENCE IN LICENSING
ELECTRICIANS, PLUMBERS, HVAC, OR MECHANICAL TRADES;
(V) FOUR MEMBERS REPRESENTING RESIDENTIAL HOUSING
CONSUMERS, AT LEAST ONE OF WHOM REPRESENTS A RURAL AREA, ONE OF
WHOM REPRESENTS A MUNICIPALITY, AND ALL OF WHOM, TAKEN AS A
WHOLE AND TO THE GREATEST EXTENT POSSIBLE, REPRESENT THE
-6- HB26-1415

GEOGRAPHIC DIVERSITY OF THE STATE;
(VI) TWO MEMBERS WHO HAVE EXPERTISE IN RESOLVING
RESIDENTIAL CONSTRUCTION DISPUTES; AND
(VII) THREE MEMBERS REPRESENTING THE RESIDENTIAL
CONSTRUCTION CONTRACTING INDUSTRY.
(e) THE MEMBER APPOINTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (3)(d)(I)
OF THIS SECTION SHALL CALL THE FIRST MEETING OF THE BOARD. THE
BOARD SHALL ELECT A CHAIR FROM AMONG ITS MEMBERS TO SERVE FOR
A TERM NOT TO EXCEED TWO YEARS, AS DETERMINED BY THE BOARD.
(f) THE TERM OF OFFICE OF BOARD MEMBERS IS FOUR YEARS;
EXCEPT THAT THE ATTORNEY GENERAL OR THEIR DESIGNEE SHALL
DESIGNATE TWO MEMBERS APPOINTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
(3)(d)(V) OF THIS SECTION, ONE OF THE MEMBERS APPOINTED PURSUANT
TO SUBSECTION (3)(d)(VI) OF THIS SECTION, AND THREE OF THE MEMBERS
APPOINTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTIONS (3)(d)(I), (3)(d)(II), (3)(d)(IV),
AND (3)(d)(VII) OF THIS SECTION TO SERVE INITIAL TERMS OF TWO YEARS.
(g) A VACANCY ON THE BOARD SHALL BE FILLED BY THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL OR THEIR DESIGNEE AS SOON AS POSSIBLE. A PERSON
APPOINTED TO FILL A VACANCY SERVES FOR THE REMAINDER OF THE
UNEXPIRED TERM.
(h) THE BOARD SHALL MEET AT LEAST QUARTERLY AND THE CHAIR
MAY CALL ADDITIONAL MEETINGS AS NECESSARY FOR THE BOARD TO
COMPLETE ITS DUTIES.
(i) EACH MEMBER OF THE BOARD IS ENTITLED TO RECEIVE FROM
MONEY IN THE FUND A PER DIEM ALLOWANCE OF FIFTY DOLLARS FOR EACH
DAY SPENT ATTENDING OFFICIAL BOARD MEETINGS.
(4) Fee.
-7- HB26-1415

(a) A CONTRACTOR CERTIFICATION FEE IN AN AMOUNT SET BY THE
ENTERPRISE, UP TO A MAXIMUM OF ONE HUNDRED DOLLARS, IS IMPOSED
ON EACH RESIDENTIAL CONSTRUCTION CONTRACTOR THAT APPLIES TO THE
BOARD FOR A CERTIFICATION. EACH RESIDENTIAL CONSTRUCTION
CONTRACTOR THAT APPLIES FOR A CERTIFICATION SHALL PAY THE
CONTRACTOR CERTIFICATION FEE TO THE ENTERPRISE AT THE TIME AND IN
THE MANNER PRESCRIBED BY THE ENTERPRISE IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (6) OF THIS SECTION. THE MONEY FROM THE FEE IMPOSED
PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (4)(a) IS EXCLUDED FROM THE STATE'S
FISCAL YEAR SPENDING.
(b) THE ENTERPRISE SHALL TRANSMIT THE MONEY FROM THE FEES
COLLECTED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (4) TO THE STATE TREASURER,
WHO SHALL CREDIT THE MONEY TO THE CONTRACTOR CERTIFICATION FEE
CASH FUND CREATED IN SUBSECTION (5) OF THIS SECTION.
(c) THE ENTERPRISE SHALL ENSURE, BY LOWERING THE FEE
IMPOSED BY THIS SUBSECTION (4) TO THE EXTENT NECESSARY, THAT THE
TOTAL AMOUNT OF FEE REVENUE DOES NOT EXCEED ONE HUNDRED
MILLION DOLLARS OVER THE FIRST FIVE FISCAL YEARS OF THE
ENTERPRISE'S EXISTENCE.
(5) Fund.
(a) THE CONTRACTOR CERTIFICATION CASH FUND IS CREATED IN
THE STATE TREASURY. THE FUND CONSISTS OF MONEY CREDITED TO THE
FUND PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS SECTION AND ANY OTHER
MONEY THAT THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY MAY APPROPRIATE OR TRANSFER
TO THE FUND.
(b) THE MONEY IN THE FUND SHALL NOT BE DEPOSITED IN OR
TRANSFERRED TO THE GENERAL FUND OR ANY OTHER FUND. THE STATE
-8- HB26-1415

TREASURER SHALL CREDIT ALL INTEREST AND INCOME DERIVED FROM THE
DEPOSIT AND INVESTMENT OF MONEY IN THE FUND TO THE FUND.
(c) MONEY IN THE FUND IS CONTINUOUSLY APPROPRIATED TO THE
ENTERPRISE FOR:
(I) THE COSTS OF COLLECTING THE FEE, ADMINISTERING THE
CERTIFICATION PROGRAM, AND CERTIFYING RESIDENTIAL CONSTRUCTION
CONTRACTORS IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (7) OF THIS SECTION;
(II) ANY DIRECT AND INDIRECT ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES
INCURRED BY THE ENTERPRISE; AND
(III) REPAYING THE GENERAL FUND LOAN MADE PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (5)(e) OF THIS SECTION.
(d) THE BOARD MAY SEEK, ACCEPT, AND EXPEND GIFTS, GRANTS,
OR DONATIONS FROM PRIVATE OR PUBLIC SOURCES FOR THE PURPOSES OF
THIS SECTION, SO LONG AS THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF ALL GRANTS RECEIVED
FROM THE STATE AND LOCAL GOVERNMENTS IS LESS THAN TEN PERCENT
OF THE ENTERPRISE'S TOTAL ANNUAL REVENUE.
(e) (I) ON JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER
TEN THOUSAND DOLLARS FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE FUND FOR THE
PURPOSE OF DEFRAYING EXPENSES INCURRED BY THE ENTERPRISE BEFORE
IT RECEIVES FEE REVENUE OR REVENUE BOND PROCEEDS.
NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER LAW, THE ENTERPRISE MAY ACCEPT AND
EXPEND ANY MONEY SO TRANSFERRED, AND, NOTWITHSTANDING ANY
STATE FISCAL RULE OR GENERALLY ACCEPTED ACCOUNTING PRINCIPLE
THAT COULD OTHERWISE BE INTERPRETED TO REQUIRE A CONTRARY
CONCLUSION, THE TRANSFER IS A LOAN FROM THE STATE TREASURER TO
THE ENTERPRISE THAT IS REQUIRED TO BE REPAID AND IS NOT A GRANT FOR
PURPOSES OF SECTION 20 (2)(d) OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE
-9- HB26-1415

CONSTITUTION OR AS DEFINED IN SECTION 24-77-102 (7). ALL MONEY
TRANSFERRED AS A LOAN TO THE ENTERPRISE IS CREDITED TO THE FUND
OR TO AN ACCOUNT WITHIN THE FUND. LOAN LIABILITIES THAT ARE
RECORDED IN THE FUND BUT THAT ARE NOT REQUIRED TO BE PAID IN THE
CURRENT FISCAL YEAR SHALL NOT BE CONSIDERED WHEN CALCULATING
THE SUFFICIENT STATUTORY FUND BALANCE FOR PURPOSES OF SECTION
24-75-109.
(II) NO LATER THAN DECEMBER 31, 2027, THE ENTERPRISE SHALL
REPAY THE LOAN OF TEN THOUSAND DOLLARS RECEIVED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (5)(e)(I) OF THIS SECTION AND ACCUMULATED INTEREST.
INTEREST ACCRUES ON THE MONEY BORROWED AT THE RATE PER ANNUM
ON THE MOST RECENTLY ISSUED TEN-YEAR UNITED STATES TREASURY
NOTE, ROUNDED TO THE NEAREST ONE-TENTH OF ONE PERCENT, AS
REPORTED BY THE WALL STREET JOURNAL AS OF THE DATE THE TRANSFER
REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (5)(e)(I) OF THIS SECTION IS MADE, BEGINNING
ON THAT DATE AND CONTINUING UNTIL THE DATE ON WHICH THE MONEY
IS REPAID.
(III) THIS SUBSECTION (5)(e) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2028.
(6) Residential construction improvement goals. THE
ENTERPRISE SHALL ADMINISTER THE CERTIFICATION PROGRAM IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE FOLLOWING GOALS:
(a) PREVENTING OR REDUCING DAMAGE TO HOMEOWNERS CAUSED
BY CONTRACTORS WHO ABANDON WORK BEFORE A PROJECT IS COMPLETE;
(b) ENCOURAGING CONTRACTORS TO COMPLY WITH THE TERMS OF
A CONSTRUCTION AGREEMENT WITH A HOMEOWNER; AND
(c) INCREASING THE LIKELIHOOD OF A CONTRACTOR PERFORMING
-10- HB26-1415

COMPETENTLY BY ENCOURAGING CONTRACTORS TO BE CERTIFIED BY THE
ENTERPRISE.
(7) Certification program.
(a) THE RESIDENTIAL CONSTRUCTION CONTRACTOR CERTIFICATION
PROGRAM, BY WHICH A CONTRACTOR MAY OBTAIN CERTIFICATION FROM
THE BOARD TO PERFORM RESIDENTIAL CONSTRUCTION PROJECTS, IS
CREATED. THE ENTERPRISE SHALL ADMINISTER THE CERTIFICATION
PROGRAM AND ISSUE CERTIFICATES AS PROVIDED IN THIS SUBSECTION (7).
(b) THE PURPOSE OF THE CERTIFICATION PROGRAM IS TO ACHIEVE
THE GOALS SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (6) OF THIS SECTION BY
ENCOURAGING CONTRACTORS TO PARTICIPATE IN THE CERTIFICATION
PROGRAM AND OBTAIN A CERTIFICATION FROM THE BOARD PURSUANT TO
THIS SECTION, PROVIDE BETTER SERVICE TO CONSUMERS, AND FOSTER A
SENSE OF CONFIDENCE IN CONSUMERS THAT CERTIFIED CONTRACTORS ARE
RELIABLE, SAFE, AND COMPETENT. THE BOARD SHALL ESTABLISH CRITERIA
TO EVALUATE APPLICATIONS FOR CERTIFICATION BASED ON:
(I) WHETHER THE CONTRACTOR PROCURES AND MAINTAINS
ADEQUATE FINANCIAL SECURITY TO COVER ITS POTENTIAL LIABILITIES.
ADEQUATE FINANCIAL SECURITY INCLUDES A SURETY BOND OR LIABILITY
INSURANCE IN COMMERCIALLY REASONABLE COVERAGE AMOUNTS TAKING
INTO ACCOUNT THE POTENTIAL LIABILITY EXPOSURE OF A CONTRACTOR
APPLYING FOR A CERTIFICATION.
(II) THE DEGREE OF THE CONTRACTOR'S COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER
APPLICABLE CONSTRUCTION LICENSING REQUIREMENTS;
(III) THE DEGREE OF THE CONTRACTOR'S COMPLIANCE WITH
APPLICABLE BUILDING CODES;
(IV) THE CONTRACTOR'S SKILL LEVEL, AS INDICATED BY OTHER
-11- HB26-1415

CERTIFICATIONS, LICENSES, PROJECTS UNDERTAKEN, EDUCATIONAL LEVEL,
REPUTATION, AND EXPERIENCE IN THE INDUSTRY;
(V) ANY INFORMATION RELATED TO THE QUALITY OF THE
CONTRACTOR'S PERFORMANCE ON RESIDENTIAL CONSTRUCTION PROJECTS;
(VI) THE DEGREE TO WHICH THE CONTRACTOR COMPLETED
PROJECTS ON TIME AND IN ACCORDANCE WITH ITS CONTRACTUAL
OBLIGATIONS; AND
(VII) THE NATURE OF ANY RESIDENTIAL CONSTRUCTION PROJECT
DISPUTES INVOLVING THE CONTRACTOR AND THE RESOLUTION OF THE
DISPUTE, IF ANY.
(c) A CONTRACTOR MAY SUBMIT AN APPLICATION TO THE
ENTERPRISE FOR A CERTIFICATION PURSUANT TO THE POLICIES AND
PROCEDURES ADOPTED BY THE BOARD.
(8) Reporting. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I),
THE BOARD SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT BY JULY 1 OF EACH YEAR TO THE
COMMITTEES OF REFERENCE OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY TO WHICH THE
DEPARTMENT IS ASSIGNED PURSUANT TO SECTION 2-7-203 (1). THE
REPORT MUST INCLUDE:
(a) THE UNOBLIGATED BALANCE OF THE FUND, THE NUMBER OF
CERTIFICATION APPLICATIONS RECEIVED, AND THE NUMBER OF
CERTIFICATES ISSUED;
(b) THE PROGRESS TOWARD ACHIEVEMENT OF THE RESIDENTIAL
CONSTRUCTION IMPROVEMENT GOALS SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (6) OF
THIS SECTION AND THE PRIMARY FACTORS FACILITATING AND INHIBITING
THAT PROGRESS; AND
(c) ANY SUGGESTED LEGISLATION OR POLICY CHANGES.
(9) Repeal. THIS SECTION IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1,
-12- HB26-1415

2037.
SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-13- HB26-1415